Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-7520
Advisory organizations and statistical agents; prohibited activities.

Except as permitted in sections 44-7521 and 44-7522, no advisory organization or statistical agent shall compile, file, or distribute recommendations relating to rating systems that include profits, dividends, or expenses other than loss adjustment expenses.

Laws 2000, LB 1119, § 20.